Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2800.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-1464, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-1464. Ignition interlock devices; violations; classification; definition A. Except in cases of a substantial emergency, a person shall not knowingly rent, lease or lend a motor vehicle to a person whose another person while knowing that the other person who wishes to rent, lease or receive the motor vehicle has a limited driving privilege is limited pursuant to section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-3319 or a restricted driving PRIVILEGE pursuant to section 28-1402 unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified ignition interlock device. B. A person whose driving privilege is limited pursuant to section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-3319 or restricted pursuant to section 28-1402 and who rents, leases or borrows a motor vehicle from another person shall notify the person who rents, leases or lends the motor vehicle to the person that the person has specific requirements for the operation of the motor vehicle and the nature of the requirements. C. During any period when a person whose driving privilege is limited pursuant to section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-3319 or restricted pursuant to section 28-1402 is required to operate only a motor vehicle that is equipped with a certified ignition interlock device, the person shall not request or permit allow any other person to breathe into the ignition interlock device or start a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device for the purpose of providing the person with an operable motor vehicle. D. A person shall not breathe into an ignition interlock device or start a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device for the purpose of providing an operable motor vehicle to a person whose driving privilege is limited pursuant to section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-3319 or restricted pursuant to section 28-1402. E. A person whose driving privilege is limited pursuant to section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-3319 or restricted pursuant to section 28-1402 shall not tamper with or circumvent the operation of an ignition interlock device. F. A person who is not an ignition interlock service provider or an agent or subcontractor of an ignition interlock service provider and who is not a person whose driving privilege is limited pursuant to section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-3319 or restricted pursuant to section 28-1402 shall not tamper with or circumvent the operation of an ignition interlock device. G. Except in cases of substantial emergency, a person whose driving privilege is limited pursuant to section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-3319 or restricted pursuant to section 28-1402 shall not operate a motor vehicle without a functioning certified ignition interlock device during the applicable time period. H. If the ignition interlock device is removed from a vehicle by an ignition interlock service provider, the ignition interlock manufacturer shall electronically notify the department in a form prescribed by the department that the ignition interlock device has been removed from the vehicle. I. If the a person does not provide evidence to the department within seventy-two hours that the person has installed a functioning certified ignition interlock device in each vehicle operated by the person and has provided proof of installation to the department, the department shall suspend the special ignition interlock restricted driver license or privilege as prescribed in section 28-1463. J. A person who is ordered by the court or required by the department pursuant to section 28-3319 to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device shall while under arrest submit to any test chosen by a law enforcement officer pursuant to section 28-1321, subsection A. K. A person who violates this section is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor except a person who knowingly lends a motor vehicle to another person in violation of subsection A of this section and during the time the other person operates the motor vehicle the other person is INVOLVED in a collision that results in death or serious physical injury as defined in section 13-105, the person who knowingly lends the motor vehicle is guilty of a class 6 felony. Additionally, if a person is convicted of violating subsection B, C, E or G of this section, the department shall extend the duration of the certified ignition interlock device requirement for not more than one year. L. For the purposes of this section, "substantial emergency" means that a person other than the person whose driving privilege is limited pursuant to section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-3319 or restricted pursuant to section 28-1402 is not reasonably available to drive in response to an emergency. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.